Nevada, session 83, SB67.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 41.0339 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.0339 1. The official attorney shall provide for the defense,
including the defense of cross-claims and counterclaims, of any
present or former local judicial officer, state judicial officer, officer
or employee of the State or a political subdivision, immune
contractor or State Legislator in any civil action brought against that
person based on any alleged act or omission relating to the person’s
public duties or employment, or any other person who is named as a
defendant in a civil action solely because of an alleged act or
omission relating to the public duties or employment of a local
judicial officer, state judicial officer, officer or employee of the
State or a political subdivision, immune contractor or State
Legislator, if:
-
*SB67*

– 3 –
(a) [Within 15 days after service of a copy of the summons and
complaint or other legal document commencing the action, the] The
person submits a written request for defense [:] within the time
specified in subsection 2:
(1) To the official attorney; or
(2) If the officer, employee or immune contractor has an
administrative superior, to the administrator of the person’s agency
and the official attorney; and
(b) The official attorney has determined that the act or omission
on which the action is based appears to be within the course and
scope of public duty or employment and appears to have been
performed or omitted in good faith.
2. Regardless of the date on which the Attorney General,
person designated by the Attorney General or person serving in
the office of administrative head of the named agency receives
service pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 41.031, a written request
for defense pursuant to subsection 1 must be submitted to the
official attorney and, if applicable, the administrator of the
person’s agency, within 15 days after the date on which:
(a) The person receives service of a copy of the summons and
complaint or other legal document commencing the action or
waives such service; or
(b) A court of competent jurisdiction enters an order finding
that the person was served by an alternative service method
pursuant to the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure.
3. If the official attorney determines that it is impracticable,
uneconomical or could constitute a conflict of interest for the legal
service to be rendered by the official attorney or a deputy of the
official attorney, the official attorney must employ special counsel
pursuant to NRS 41.03435 or 41.0344, whichever is applicable.
Sec. 2. NRS 41.03455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.03455 [At any time after] A person authorized to submit a
written request for defense [is submitted] pursuant to [the official
attorney, the person requesting the defense] NRS 41.0339 may
employ his or her own counsel to defend the action. [At that time,]
Upon the retention by a person of his or her own legal counsel, the
State or political subdivision is excused from any further duty to
represent [that] the person and is not liable for any expenses in
defending the action, including court costs and attorney’s fees.
Sec. 3. NRS 41.0348 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.0348 In every action or proceeding in any court [of this
state] in which both the State or political subdivision and any
present or former officer, employee, immune contractor or member
of a board or commission thereof or any present or former State
Legislator are named defendants, the court or jury in rendering any
-
*SB67*

– 4 –
final judgment, verdict, or other disposition shall return a special
verdict in the form of written findings which determine whether:
1. The individual defendant was acting within the scope of the
defendant’s public duty or employment; and
2. [The] Clear and convincing evidence establishes that the
alleged act or omission by the individual defendant [was wanton]
involved oppression, fraud or [malicious.] malice, express or
implied, as those terms are defined in NRS 42.001.
Sec. 4. NRS 41.0349 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.0349 1. [In] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, any civil action brought against any present or former officer,
employee, immune contractor, member of a board or commission of
the State or a political subdivision or State Legislator, in which a
judgment is entered against the person based on any act or omission
relating to the person’s public duty or employment, the State or
political subdivision shall indemnify the person unless:
[1.] (a) The person failed to submit a timely request for
defense;
[2.] (b) The person failed to cooperate in good faith in the
defense of the action;
[3.] (c) The act or omission of the person was not within the
scope of the person’s public duty or employment [; or
4.] , including, without limitation, where the person was
terminated from employment or resigned in lieu of termination
based upon a determination by the State or political subdivision
that the act or omission was not within the scope of the person’s
public duty or employment;
(d) The person has been held criminally liable for the act or
omission which is the subject of the civil action; or
(e) The act or omission of the person [was wanton] results in
exemplary or [malicious.] punitive damages.
2. The State or political subdivision may indemnify a person
if:
(a) The exemplary or punitive damages are related to a
violation of state or federal law; and
(b) In the opinion of the official attorney:
(1) The act or omission upon which the damages are based
did not involve conscious disregard, fraud, malice or oppression,
as those terms are defined in NRS 42.001;
(2) The act or omission of the person was performed in
good faith; and
(3) Payment of the judgment or settlement is in the best
interest of the State or political subdivision.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the
State or political subdivision to indemnify a person against
-
*SB67*

– 5 –
exemplary or punitive damages which are related to the
commission of a crime.
4. As used in this section, “official attorney” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 41.0338.
Sec. 5. NRS 41.745 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.745 1. An employer is not liable for harm or injury caused
by the intentional conduct of an employee if the conduct of the
employee:
(a) Was a truly independent venture of the employee;
(b) Was not committed in the course of the very task assigned to
the employee; and
(c) Was not reasonably foreseeable under the facts and
circumstances of the case considering the nature and scope of his or
her employment.
 For the purposes of this subsection, conduct of an employee is
reasonably foreseeable if a person of ordinary intelligence and
prudence could have reasonably anticipated the conduct and the
probability of injury.
2. Nothing in this section imposes strict liability on an
employer for any unforeseeable intentional act of an employee.
3. A public employer shall not be subject to liability based
exclusively on a theory of respondeat superior or vicarious
liability. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose
liability on a public employer for a deprivation of constitutional
rights which is caused by the conduct of an employee or officer
unless:
(a) The public employer was personally involved in the
deprivation; or
(b) A sufficient causal connection exists between wrongful
conduct of the public employer and the deprivation.
4. For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Employee” means any person who is employed by an
employer, including, without limitation, any present or former
officer or employee, immune contractor, an employee of a
university school for profoundly gifted pupils described in chapter
388C of NRS or a member of a board or commission or Legislator
in this State.
(b) “Employer” means any public or private employer in this
State, including, without limitation, the State of Nevada, a university
school for profoundly gifted pupils described in chapter 388C of
NRS, any agency of this State and any political subdivision of the
State.
(c) “Immune contractor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
subsection 3 of NRS 41.0307.
-
*SB67*

– 6 –
(d) “Officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in subsection 4 of
NRS 41.0307.
Sec. 6. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to any
cause of action or claim that accrues on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB67*